Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 6. Miscellaneous Provisions.

§ 64.2-2739.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

2016, c. 266.

§ 64.2-2740.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, or supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede § 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in § 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. § 7003(b).

History.

2016, c. 266.

§ 64.2-2741.
Application to existing relationships.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, on and after July 1, 2016:

This chapter applies to a power of appointment created before, on, or after July 1, 2016;

This chapter applies to a judicial proceeding concerning a power of appointment commenced on or after July 1, 2016;

This chapter applies to a judicial proceeding concerning a power of appointment commenced before July 1, 2016, unless the court finds that application of a particular provision of this chapter would interfere substantially with the effective conduct of the judicial proceeding or prejudice a right of a party, in which case the particular provision of this chapter does not apply and the superseded law applies;

A rule of construction or presumption provided in this chapter applies to an instrument executed before July 1, 2016, unless there is a clear indication of a contrary intent in the terms of the instrument; and

Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions 1 through 4, an action done before July 1, 2016, is not affected by this chapter.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred on the expiration of a prescribed period that commenced under law of the Commonwealth other than this chapter before July 1, 2016, the law continues to apply to the right.

History.

2016, c. 266.